District of Columbia statutes.
28:11-107

Transition provisions as to priorities.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the Uniform Commercial Code effective January 1, 1965, shall apply to any questions of priority if the positions of the parties were fixed prior to the effective date of this act (as provided in section 28:11-101 ). In other cases questions of priority shall be determined by this act.

History

Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-85, § 40, 29 DCR 309

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:11-107.

References in Text

“This act”, referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 4-85.